District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0764.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Omnibus Barry Farm Redevelopment Clarification Temporary
Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The Omnibus Barry Farm Redevelopment Act of 2022, effective December 13,
2022 (D.C. Law 24-192; 69 DCR 12698), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2(b) is amended to read as follows:
“(b) The ordering of the street and alley closures and removal of building restriction lines
set forth in subsection (a) of this section is contingent upon satisfaction of all the conditions set
forth by the District Department of Transportation in the official file for S.O. 17-26688 for each
phase or subphase prior to the recordation of a plat by the Surveyor for such phase or
subphase. The Surveyor shall record the street and alley closing plats in multiple phases or
subphases as the work is completed and approved by the District Department of Transportation,
with the plat or plats for each phase or subphase for Phase 1A recorded no later than December
2028; the plat or plats for each phase or subphase for Phase 1B recorded no later than December
2030; and the plat or plats for each phase or subphase for Phases 2A and 2B recorded no later
than December 2034.”.
(b) Section 3(b)(2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) The Surveyor shall record the street and alley dedication and designation
plats in multiple phases, as indicated in S.O. 17-26689, with the plat or plats for each phase or
subphase for Phase 1A recorded no later than December 31, 2028, the plat or plats for each phase
or subphase for Phase 1B recorded no later than December 31, 2026, and the plat or plats for
each phase or subphase for Phases 2A and 2B recorded no later than December 31, 2034.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2